Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 3 Selection and Oath of Assessors

22-2-40.
Selection of assessors generally; authority.

The condemnor and the condemnee shall each select an assessor, and the two assessors so selected shall select a third assessor. No person shall be selected as an assessor unless such person is a real estate appraiser who has an appraiser classification of certified general appraiser granted under Chapter 39A of Title 43, the “Real Estate Appraiser and Classification Act.” The condemnor shall be liable for the costs of the assessor selected by or for the condemnor, the condemnee shall be liable for the costs of the assessor selected by or for the condemnee, and the costs of the assessor selected by the other assessors or by the judge shall be split equally between the condemnor and condemnee. The combined total costs of all three assessors shall not exceed $500.00 per day.

The assessors selected as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall have no authority to decide questions of law including, but not limited to, issues of compensability.

The assessors selected as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall have the authority to refer questions of law to the appropriate superior court prior to entering an award. Neither party shall be prohibited from appealing a question of law to the superior court after the entry of the assessor’s award.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 15; Civil Code 1895, § 4671; Civil Code 1910, § 5220; Code 1933, § 36-402; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 1.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

22-2-41.
Selection of assessor by judge of the probate court; selection of assessor; rights of owners in selecting assessor.

If any party to the condemnation notifies the judge of the probate court of the county where the property or interest is located that the owner of the property has failed to select an assessor, or that the owners or their representatives have failed to agree on an assessor, or that the owner is unknown, or that the owner or any one of the owners is a minor or otherwise under disability and without legal representative, the judge of the probate court shall select an assessor for such owners or representatives. If the judge of the probate court is disqualified, the clerk of the superior court of the county shall make the selection after like notice.

All persons having any interest in the property sought to be condemned shall have equal rights in the selection of an assessor.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 14; Civil Code 1895, § 4670; Civil Code 1910, § 5219; Code 1933, § 36-401.

22-2-42.
Failure of parties’ nominees to select third assessor.

If the two assessors selected by the condemnor and the condemnee do not agree upon a third assessor within five days after the selection of the second assessor, the judge of the superior court of the county where the property or interest is situated shall, upon application of either party, of which the other shall have notice, make the selection.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 15; Civil Code 1895, § 4671; Civil Code 1910, § 5220; Code 1933, § 36-402.

22-2-43.
Oath of assessors.

The three assessors thus selected shall be sworn by some officer authorized to administer an oath “to do equal and exact justice between the parties according to law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 16; Civil Code 1895, § 4672; Civil Code 1910, § 5221; Code 1933, § 36-403.